Utah statutes.
11-37-101  (Repealed 05/01/13).   Definition -- Procurement -- Use of recycled goods.

(1)  "Local government entity" means:

(a)  municipalities, cities, and counties;

(b)  entities created under Title 26A, Chapter 1, Local Health Departments; and

(c)  political subdivisions created by cities or counties, including entities created under:

(i)  Title 35A, Chapter 8, Part 7, Utah Housing Corporation Act; and

(ii)  Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act.

(2)  The procurement officer or other person responsible for purchasing supplies for each local government entity shall:

(a)  maintain for reference a copy of the current listing of recycled items available on state contract as issued by the chief procurement officer under Section 63G-6-204; and

(b)  give recycled items consideration when inviting bids and purchasing supplies.

